Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 2

Stream Mapping in Sumner County Watersheds

69-3-201. Stream mapping project established.

The department of environment and conservation is hereby directed to conduct a stream mapping project in the Red River and Barren River watersheds of Sumner County.

Acts 1998, ch. 623, § 1; T.C.A. §69-3-301.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§69-3-201 —69-3-211 (Acts 1955, ch. 151, §§ 1-7; T.C.A. §§ 70-1901 — 70-1912; Acts 1984, ch. 794, § 13, concerning Tennessee River Basin water pollution control, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 488, § 2.

69-3-202. “Stream mapping” defined.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires, “stream mapping” means the collection and analysis of water samples along streams that normally exhibit water flow at least six (6) consecutive months per year within a given area.

Acts 1998, ch. 623, § 1; T.C.A. §69-3-302.

69-3-203. Guidelines for collection of samples.

Water samples collected pursuant to this part shall be collected according to each of the following guidelines:

At distances along each of the streams in the Red River and Barren River watersheds in Sumner County of no greater than three (3) miles from the previous sample taken;

At or near the same location for each sampling; and

On a regular, quarterly basis.

Acts 1998, ch. 623, § 1; T.C.A. §69-3-303.

69-3-204. Analysis of samples.

Samples collected pursuant to this part shall each be analyzed for pH, ammonia, and biological oxygen demand (BOD) in accordance with the guidelines set forth by the environmental protection agency.

Acts 1998, ch. 623, § 1; T.C.A. §69-3-304.